Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.480

Name of converted savings bank.

A savings bank shall not be forbidden or required to change its corporate name as a result of its conversion pursuant to this chapter.

[ 1994 c 256 s 107; 1981 c 85 s 95.]

NOTES:

Findings—Construction—1994 c 256: See RCW 43.320.007.